District of Columbia statutes.
10-222

Control of lands, buildings, and other facilities.

The control of all land, buildings, and other facilities used by the Board shall be in accordance with agreements reached between the Board and the governmental agencies having jurisdiction over such properties.

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 264, ch. 265, art. III, § 2
Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.
1973 Ed., § 8-215.
1981 Ed., § 8-222.